Hawaii statutes.
[§346F-9] Penalties for failure to
pay nursing facility sustainability fee. (a) If a nursing facility fails
to pay the full amount of the nursing facility sustainability fee when
due, there shall be added to the fee, unless waived by the department
for reasonable cause, a penalty equal to two per cent of the fee that was
not paid when due. Any subsequent payments shall be credited first to unpaid
fee amounts rather than to penalty or interest amounts, beginning with the most
delinquent installment.

(b) In addition to the penalty identified in
this section, the department may seek any of the following remedies for failure
of any nursing facility to pay its fee when due:

(1) Withholding any medical assistance reimbursement
payments until such time as the fee amount is paid in full;

(2) Suspension or revocation of the nursing facility license;
or

(3) Development of a plan that requires the nursing facility
to pay any delinquent fee in installments. [L 2012, c 156, pt of §2, §5; am L
2013, c 142, §3; am L 2014, c 124, §2; am L 2015, c 69, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next